adjectives_formation.lexd
PATTERNS
Adjective ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
((AdjectiveOblC [>:>] [<obl>:а]) | AdjectiveOblV) [>:>] (DeclensionM | DeclensionF | DeclensionN | DeclensionHPL | DeclensionNPL) ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

(AdjectiveM | AdjectiveF | AdjectiveN | AdjectiveHPL | AdjectiveNPL) ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
AdjectiveOblM [>:>] DeclensionM ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
AdjectiveOblF [>:>] DeclensionF ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
AdjectiveOblN [>:>] DeclensionN ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
AdjectiveOblHPL [>:>] DeclensionHPL ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
AdjectiveOblNPL [>:>] DeclensionNPL ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

PATTERN DeclensionM
[<obl><m>:щ] [>:>] [<erg>:ти] ([>:>] SpatialCase)?
OblMarker[m] ([<gen>:] | ([>:>] [<gen>:б])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)?
OblMarker[m] [>:>] (CaseMarker[-erg,-gen] | SpatialCase | (CaseMarker[-erg,-gen] [>:>] SpatialCase))

PATTERN DeclensionF
[<obl><f>:т] [>:>] [<erg>:ти] ([>:>] SpatialCase)?
OblMarker[f] [>:>] (CaseMarker[-erg] | SpatialCase | (CaseMarker[-erg] [>:>] SpatialCase))

PATTERN DeclensionN
[<n>:т] [>:>] [<erg>:ти] ([>:>] SpatialCase)?
OblMarker[n] [>:>] (CaseMarker[-erg] | SpatialCase | (CaseMarker[-erg] [>:>] SpatialCase))

PATTERN DeclensionHPL
OblMarker[hpl] ([<gen>:] | ([>:>] [<gen>:б])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)?
OblMarker[hpl] [>:>] (CaseMarker[-gen] | SpatialCase | (CaseMarker[-gen] [>:>] SpatialCase))

PATTERN DeclensionNPL
OblMarker[npl] [>:>] (CaseMarker | SpatialCase | (CaseMarker [>:>] SpatialCase))

PATTERN SpatialCase
LocMarker ([<ess>:] | [<lat>:])
LocMarker[-cont] [>:>] DirMarker
LocMarker[cont] [>:>] DirMarker[-al,-trans]

LEXICON OblMarker
<obl><m>:щу[m]
<obl><f>:лълъи[f]
<obl><n>:лълъи[n]
<obl><h><pl>:рду[hpl]
<obl><n><pl>:рди[npl]

LEXICON LocMarker
<sup>:ла
<cont>:чIу[cont]
<in>:о
<inter>:лIи
<apud>:ха
<ad>:хъи
<place>:алда

LEXICON DirMarker
<elat>:ру
<allat>:ху[al]
<translat>:руху[trans]
<translat>:риди[trans]
<translat>:руди[trans]
<translat>:рикьи[trans]

LEXICON CaseMarker
<erg>:ди[erg]
<gen>:лIи[gen]
<dat>:лъи
<aff>:ра
